Utah statutes.
63B-11-301.   State Bonding Commission authorized to issue general obligation bonds.

The commission created under Section 63B-1-201 may issue and sell general obligation bonds of the state pledging the full faith, credit, and resources of the state for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds, to provide funds to the Department of Transportation.

